test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kalendaar_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kalendār: # Noun 130 'eng /est kalender/fin' - full paradigm
     kalendār+N+Sg+Nom: kalendār
     kalendār+N+Sg+Gen: kalendār
     kalendār+N+Sg+Par: kalendārõ
     kalendār+N+Sg+Dat: kalendārõn
     kalendār+N+Sg+Ins: kalendārõks
     kalendār+N+Sg+Ill: kalendārõ
     kalendār+N+Sg+Ela: kalendārst
     kalendār+N+Pl+Nom: kalendārõd
     kalendār+N+Pl+Gen: kalendārõd
     kalendār+N+Pl+Par: kalendāridi
     kalendār+N+Pl+Dat: kalendārõdõn
     kalendār+N+Pl+Ins: kalendārõdõks
     kalendār+N+Pl+Ill: kalendāriž
     kalendār+N+Pl+Ela: kalendārist
